District of Columbia statutes.
29-1114

Duties of member.

(a)

A member shall not have a fiduciary duty to an unincorporated nonprofit association or to another member solely by being a member.

(b)

A member shall discharge the duties to the unincorporated nonprofit association and the other members and exercise any rights under this chapter consistent with the governing principles and the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1123.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 18 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).